Utah statutes.
34-34-2.   Public policy.

It is hereby declared to be the public policy of the state that the right of persons to work, whether in private employment or for the state, its counties, cities, school districts, or other political subdivisions, may not be denied or abridged on account of membership or nonmembership in any labor union, labor organization or any other type of association; and further, that the right to live includes the right to work.  The exercise of the right to work shall be protected and maintained free from undue restraints and coercion.



Amended by Chapter 297, 2011 General Session

